Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.586

Power of general partner and person dissociated as general partner to bind partnership after dissolution.

(1) A limited partnership is bound by a general partner's act after dissolution that:

(a) Is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership's activities; or

(b) Would have bound the limited partnership under RCW 25.10.381 before dissolution, if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

(2) A person dissociated as a general partner binds a limited partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

(a) At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

(i) Less than two years have passed since the dissociation; and

(ii) The other party does not have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a general partner; and

(b) The act:

(i) Is appropriate for winding up the limited partnership's activities; or

(ii) Would have bound the limited partnership under RCW 25.10.381 before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not have notice of the dissolution.

[ 2009 c 188 s 804.]